Wisconsin, session 2025, SB204.
do enact as follows:SB204,11Section 1. 20.835 (2) (de) of the statutes is created to read:SB204,2,3220.835 (2) (de) Video game production credit. A sum sufficient to make the 3payments under ss. 71.07 (12), 71.28 (12), and 71.47 (12).SB204,24Section 2. 71.05 (6) (a) 15. of the statutes is amended to read:SB204,2,10571.05 (6) (a) 15. The amount of the credits computed under s. 71.07 (2dm), 6(2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), (5i), (5j), (5k), 7(5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10), and (12) and not passed through by a partnership, limited 8liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added that amount to the 9partnership’s, company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income under s. 71.21 (4) or 1071.34 (1k) (g).SB204,311Section 3. 71.07 (12) of the statutes is created to read:SB204,2,131271.07 (12) Video game production credit. (a) Definitions. In this 13subsection:SB204,2,14141. “Claimant” means a person certified under s. 73.03 (78).SB204,2,16152. “Eligible expenditures” means amounts paid by the claimant directly 16relating to qualifying activities in this state, excluding any of the following:SB204,2,1717a. Wages.SB204,3,11b. Expenditures used to claim another credit under this chapter.SB204,3,32c. Amounts paid to a person certified to receive a credit under this subsection 3or s. 71.28 (12) or 71.47 (12).SB204,3,64d. Amounts paid to persons as a result of their participation in profits from 5video game production, such as commissions, royalties, or profit-sharing 6agreements.SB204,3,77e. Amounts paid for capital expenditures, such as buildings and equipment.SB204,3,88f. Amounts paid to purchase a copyright, trademark, or tradename.SB204,3,99g. Amounts paid for management or other administrative activities.SB204,3,1010h. Amounts paid for marketing, promotion, or distribution.SB204,3,1111i. Amounts paid for food or entertainment.SB204,3,1212j. Interest paid on loans or other credit arrangements.SB204,3,14133. “Eligible wages” means wages paid by the claimant directly relating to 14qualifying activities in this state.SB204,3,16154. “Qualifying activities” means developing, producing, or creating a video 16game product or platform.SB204,3,20175. “Video game product or platform” means an electronic game developed for 18commercial distribution and entertainment that involves interaction with a user 19interface to generate visual feedback on a video device. “Video game product or 20platform” does not include any of the following:SB204,3,2121a. A product or platform that contains content in violation of s. 944.21.SB204,3,2322b. A product or platform designed for political, religious, or educational 23purposes.SB204,4,11c. A product or platform regulated under chs. 562 to 569.SB204,4,42d. A product or platform designed to provide information about one or more 3individuals or businesses, such as marketing and promotional websites or 4microsites.SB204,4,85e. A product or platform designed for social media or interpersonal 6communications, such as podcasting, interactive advertising, journalism, video 7conferencing, wireless telecommunications, text-based channels, chat rooms, or 8broadcast or streamed viewing enhancements.SB204,4,109f. A product or platform designed to stream linear media such as audio, video, 10or pictures.SB204,4,1111g. Small-scale electronic games embedded and used exclusively in advertising.SB204,4,14126. “Wages” means wages, as defined in s. 71.63 (6), that are subject to 13withholding under subch. X and for which a statement under s. 71.65 (1) is 14furnished.SB204,4,1715(b) Filing claims. Subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, for 16taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, a claimant may claim as a credit 17against the tax imposed under s. 71.02 any of the following amounts:SB204,4,19181. An amount equal to 30 percent of the eligible wages paid by the person in 19the taxable year.SB204,4,21202. An amount equal to 30 percent of the eligible expenditures incurred by the 21claimant in the taxable year.SB204,5,322(c) Limitations. 1. No credit may be allowed under this subsection unless the 23claimant files an application with the department, at the time and in the manner 1prescribed by the department, and the department approves the application. The 2claimant shall submit a copy of the approved application with the claimant’s 3return.SB204,5,1442. No credit may be allowed under this subsection unless the claimant retains 5at the claimant’s sole expense a certified public accountant licensed under ch. 442 6to review and certify to the department the total eligible expenditures incurred and 7total eligible wages paid in the taxable and to conduct the audit required under s. 873.03 (78) (c). No audit of a claimant required under s. 73.03 (78) (c) may be 9performed by a certified public accountant that is part of an accounting entity that 10is not determined by the department to be independent of the claimant, consistent 11with s. 442.10 and as provided in the code of professional conduct of the American 12Institute of Certified Public Accountants, or its successor organization, or as 13otherwise determined by the department. The certified public accountant shall do 14all of the following:SB204,5,1615a. Conduct the audit required under s. 73.03 (78) (c) according to any rules 16promulgated by the department.SB204,5,1817b. Verify each reported expenditure that is included in the audit and identify 18and exclude each expenditure that does not satisfy this subsection.SB204,6,2193. Eligible expenditures incurred and eligible wages paid by a tax-option 20corporation, partnership, or limited liability company that is treated as a 21partnership may be claimed as a credit under this subsection by that corporation’s 22shareholders, that partnership’s partners, or that limited liability company’s 23members who are residents of this state and who otherwise qualify under this 1subsection, unless the tax-option corporation, partnership, or limited liability 2company has made an election under s. 71.21 (6) (a) or 71.365 (4m) (a).SB204,6,634. If a tax-option corporation, partnership, or limited liability company makes 4an election under s. 71.21 (6) (a) or 71.365 (4m) (a), that tax-option corporation, 5partnership, or limited liability company may claim the credit under this 6subsection.SB204,6,87(d) Administration. 1. Section 71.28 (4) (e), (g), and (h), as it applies to the 8credit under s. 71.28 (4), applies to the credits under this subsection.SB204,6,1592. If the allowable amount of the claim under par. (b) exceeds the tax 10otherwise due under this chapter or no tax is due under this chapter, the amount of 11the claim not used to offset the tax due shall be certified by the department of 12revenue to the department of administration for payment by check, share draft, or 13other draft drawn from the appropriation account under s. 20.835 (2) (de). 14Notwithstanding s. 71.82 (1) (b), no interest shall be added to amounts certified 15under this subdivision.SB204,416Section 4. 71.10 (4) (i) of the statutes is amended to read:SB204,7,21771.10 (4) (i) The total of claim of right credit under s. 71.07 (1), farmland 18preservation credit under ss. 71.57 to 71.61, farmland preservation credit, 2010 and 19beyond under s. 71.613, homestead credit under subch. VIII, jobs tax credit under s. 2071.07 (3q), business development credit under s. 71.07 (3y), research credit under s. 2171.07 (4k) (e) 2. a., veterans and surviving spouses property tax credit under s. 2271.07 (6e), enterprise zone jobs credit under s. 71.07 (3w), electronics and 23information technology manufacturing zone credit under s. 71.07 (3wm), earned 1income tax credit under s. 71.07 (9e), video game production credit under s. 71.07 2(12), estimated tax payments under s. 71.09, and taxes withheld under subch. X.SB204,53Section 5. 71.21 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB204,7,7471.21 (4) (a) The amount of the credits computed by a partnership under s. 571.07 (2dm), (2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), 6(5g), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10), and (12) and passed through to 7partners shall be added to the partnership’s income.SB204,68Section 6. 71.21 (6) (d) 3. of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb204 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb204 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB204 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB204 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB204: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting